oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SET utf-8
NAME		esperanto
VERSION		4.3
HOME		https://github.com/pok49/ispell-eo
AUTHOR		Sergio Pokrovskij
EMAIL		sergio.pokrovskij(ĉe)gmail(punkto)com
COPYRIGHT	GPL 2.0
#
MIDWORD -
RARE ?
BAD !
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
REP 11
REP ĥ ĉ
REP ĥ k
REP cx ĉ
REP gx ĝ
REP hx ĥ
REP jx ĵ
REP sx ŝ
REP ux ŭ
REP rn m
REP m rn
REP la_la la
MAP 7
MAP cčćêĉ
MAP gĝ
MAP hĥ
MAP jĵ
MAP sšŝ
MAP uwúûùŭ
MAP Iitl
PFX a Y 1
PFX a 0 al .
PFX b Y 1
PFX b 0 mem .
PFX c Y 1
PFX c 0 ĉef .
PFX d Y 1
PFX d 0 de .
PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 ne .
PFX f Y 1
PFX f 0 for .
PFX h Y 1
PFX h 0 duon .
PFX i Y 10
PFX i 0 mia .
PFX i 0 via .
PFX i 0 lia .
PFX i 0 ŝia .
PFX i 0 ĝia .
PFX i 0 sia .
PFX i 0 nia .
PFX i 0 ilia .
PFX i 0 iu .
PFX i 0 ĉiu .
PFX j Y 1
PFX j 0 kun .
PFX k Y 1
PFX k 0 ek .
PFX l Y 1
PFX l 0 el .
PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 mal .
PFX m Y 2
PFX m 0 mal .
PFX m 0 nemal .
PFX N Y 26
PFX N 0 unu .
PFX N 0 neunu .
PFX N 0 du .
PFX N 0 tri .
PFX N 0 kvar .
PFX N 0 kvin .
PFX N 0 ses .
PFX N 0 sep .
PFX N 0 ok .
PFX N 0 naŭ .
PFX N 0 dek .
PFX N 0 cent .
PFX N 0 mil .
PFX N 0 kelk .
PFX N 0 dekkelk .
PFX N 0 plur .
PFX N 0 mult [aeijoufls]
PFX N 0 multe [^aeijou]
PFX N 0 du dek
PFX N 0 tri dek
PFX N 0 kvar dek
PFX N 0 kvin dek
PFX N 0 ses dek
PFX N 0 sep dek
PFX N 0 ok dek
PFX N 0 naŭ dek
PFX n Y 9
PFX n 0 ali .
PFX n 0 ambaŭ .
PFX n 0 ĉi- .
PFX n 0 ĉiu .
PFX n 0 iu .
PFX n 0 malsam .
PFX n 0 sam .
PFX n 0 sen .
PFX n 0 tiu .
PFX o Y 1
PFX o 0 ĉirkaŭ .
PFX p Y 1
PFX p 0 pri .
PFX q Y 1
PFX q 0 kontraŭ .
PFX R Y 1
PFX R 0 re .
PFX r Y 1
PFX r 0 inter .
PFX s Y 1
PFX s 0 sen .
PFX t Y 1
PFX t 0 trans .
PFX u Y 1
PFX u 0 pra .
PFX v Y 1
PFX v 0 en .
PFX w Y 1
PFX w 0 laŭ .
PFX x Y 1
PFX x 0 eks .
PFX y Y 1
PFX y 0 mis .
PFX z Y 1
PFX z 0 dis .
PFX ÷ Y 1
PFX ÷ 0 tra .
PFX _ Y 1
PFX _ 0 sub .
PFX ^ Y 1
PFX ^ 0 super .
PFX ` Y 1
PFX ` 0 sur .
PFX [ Y 1
PFX [ 0 antaŭ .
PFX ] Y 1
PFX ] 0 post .

SFX A Y 32
SFX A a e a
SFX A 0 j a
SFX A 0 jn a
SFX A 0 n a
SFX A i a i
SFX A i aj i
SFX A i ajn i
SFX A i an i
SFX A i e i
SFX A o a o
SFX A o aj o
SFX A o ajn o
SFX A o an o
SFX A o e o
SFX A u a u
SFX A u aj u
SFX A u ajn u
SFX A u an u
SFX A u e u
SFX A on a on
SFX A on aj on
SFX A on ajn on
SFX A on an on
SFX A on e on
SFX A ’ a ’
SFX A ' a '
SFX A ’ aj ’
SFX A ' aj '
SFX A ’ ajn ’
SFX A ' ajn '
SFX A ’ an ’
SFX A ' an '
SFX B Y 27
SFX B a ema a
SFX B a emaj a
SFX B a emajn a
SFX B a eman a
SFX B a eme a
SFX B a em’ a
SFX B a em' a
SFX B a emo a
SFX B a emon a
SFX B i ema i
SFX B i emaj i
SFX B i emajn i
SFX B i eman i
SFX B i eme i
SFX B i em’ i
SFX B i em' i
SFX B i emo i
SFX B i emon i
SFX B o ema o
SFX B o emaj o
SFX B o emajn o
SFX B o eman o
SFX B o eme o
SFX B o em’ o
SFX B o em' o
SFX B o emo o
SFX B o emon o
SFX C Y 45
SFX C a eca a
SFX C a ecaj a
SFX C a ecajn a
SFX C a ecan a
SFX C a ece a
SFX C a ec’ a
SFX C a ec' a
SFX C a eco a
SFX C a econ a
SFX C i eca i
SFX C i ecaj i
SFX C i ecajn i
SFX C i ecan i
SFX C i ece i
SFX C i ec’ i
SFX C i ec' i
SFX C i eco i
SFX C i econ i
SFX C o eca o
SFX C o ecaj o
SFX C o ecajn o
SFX C o ecan o
SFX C o ece o
SFX C o ec’ o
SFX C o ec' o
SFX C o eco o
SFX C o econ o
SFX C an eca an
SFX C an ecaj an
SFX C an ecajn an
SFX C an ecan an
SFX C an ece an
SFX C an ec’ an
SFX C an ec' an
SFX C an eco an
SFX C an econ an
SFX C on eca on
SFX C on ecaj on
SFX C on ecajn on
SFX C on ecan on
SFX C on ece on
SFX C on ec’ on
SFX C on ec' on
SFX C on eco on
SFX C on econ on
SFX D Y 38
SFX D a inda a
SFX D a indaj a
SFX D a indajn a
SFX D a indan a
SFX D a inde a
SFX D a ind’ a
SFX D a ind' a
SFX D a indo a
SFX D a indon a
SFX D a indaĵ’ a
SFX D a indaĵ' a
SFX D a indaĵo a
SFX D a indaĵoj a
SFX D a indaĵojn a
SFX D a indaĵon a
SFX D a indas a
SFX D a indis a
SFX D a indos a
SFX D a indus a
SFX D 0 nda i
SFX D 0 ndaj i
SFX D 0 ndajn i
SFX D 0 ndan i
SFX D 0 nde i
SFX D 0 nd’ i
SFX D 0 nd' i
SFX D 0 ndo i
SFX D 0 ndon i
SFX D 0 ndaĵ’ i
SFX D 0 ndaĵ' i
SFX D 0 ndaĵo i
SFX D 0 ndaĵoj i
SFX D 0 ndaĵojn i
SFX D 0 ndaĵon i
SFX D 0 ndas i
SFX D 0 ndis i
SFX D 0 ndos i
SFX D 0 ndus i
SFX E Y 9
SFX E a e a
SFX E 0 j a
SFX E 0 jn a
SFX E 0 n a
SFX E o a o
SFX E o aj o
SFX E o ajn o
SFX E o an o
SFX E o e o
SFX e Y 74
SFX e a ega a
SFX e a egaj a
SFX e a egajn a
SFX e a egan a
SFX e a ege a
SFX e a eg’ a
SFX e a eg' a
SFX e a ego a
SFX e a egoj a
SFX e a egojn a
SFX e a egon a
SFX e a eta a
SFX e a etaj a
SFX e a etajn a
SFX e a etan a
SFX e a ete a
SFX e a et’ a
SFX e a et' a
SFX e a eto a
SFX e a etoj a
SFX e a etojn a
SFX e a eton a
SFX e o ega o
SFX e o egaj o
SFX e o egajn o
SFX e o egan o
SFX e o eg’ o
SFX e o eg' o
SFX e o ego o
SFX e o egoj o
SFX e o egojn o
SFX e o egon o
SFX e o eta o
SFX e o etaj o
SFX e o etajn o
SFX e o etan o
SFX e o et’ o
SFX e o et' o
SFX e o eto o
SFX e o etoj o
SFX e o etojn o
SFX e o eton o
SFX e i egi i
SFX e i egas i
SFX e i egis i
SFX e i egos i
SFX e i egus i
SFX e i egu i
SFX e i eti i
SFX e i etas i
SFX e i etis i
SFX e i etos i
SFX e i etus i
SFX e i etu i
SFX e i ego i
SFX e i egon i
SFX e i eto i
SFX e i eton i
SFX e u egi u
SFX e u egas u
SFX e u egis u
SFX e u egos u
SFX e u egus u
SFX e u egu u
SFX e u eti u
SFX e u etas u
SFX e u etis u
SFX e u etos u
SFX e u etus u
SFX e u etu u
SFX e u ego u
SFX e u egon u
SFX e u eto u
SFX e u eton u
SFX F Y 49
SFX F a e a
SFX F a ine a
SFX F a ina a
SFX F a inaj a
SFX F a inajn a
SFX F a inan a
SFX F 0 j a
SFX F 0 jn a
SFX F 0 n a
SFX F a ino a
SFX F a inoj a
SFX F a inojn a
SFX F a inon a
SFX F a o a
SFX F a oj a
SFX F a ojn a
SFX F a on a
SFX F e ina e
SFX F e inaj e
SFX F e inajn e
SFX F e inan e
SFX F e ine e
SFX F e in’ e
SFX F e in' e
SFX F e ino e
SFX F e inoj e
SFX F e inojn e
SFX F e inon e
SFX F o a o
SFX F o aj o
SFX F o ajn o
SFX F o an o
SFX F o e o
SFX F o ine o
SFX F o ina o
SFX F o inaj o
SFX F o inajn o
SFX F o inan o
SFX F o in’ o
SFX F o in' o
SFX F o ino o
SFX F o inoj o
SFX F o inojn o
SFX F o inon o
SFX F o ’ o
SFX F o ' o
SFX F 0 j o
SFX F 0 jn o
SFX F 0 n o
