oo/vimspell/eo.dic
akcento/cxO
akiri/AGORTBY
alkohola/Es
altefluga/Em
altreliefo/AMO
amo/AbO
amori/AOSVB
antaŭvidebla/E
antilopo/F
aplika/bEO
apokrifo/CEOY
aranĝa/AD
asekuri/AROqSTBY
atendi/ABGJOT
atenti/ABeGMOT
atingi/AORTY
atmosfero/AOY
atoma/CENn
aŭdu/klTy
aŭskultu/lpT_
aŭtora/ANsw
babilu/lT÷
bajta/ANOY
baptopatro/F
bati/aAdfjkLlOQRTBvYz÷
bazaro/AO^
besto/AeOu
bita/ANnw
bonfarti/AMOV
bonvoli/ABMOT
borda/An`
boru/T÷
branĉigi/AdOTXz
brila/AekMORY
brovo/AOr
bruli/ABefGklV_
bunta/ACmO
burĝo/FK
ĉambro/eKO[
ĉarmi/AeGMOUTY
ĉasta/ACOU
cedi/ABfGMOV
cela/aANnuw_
ĉemizo/AeO_`
centra/Alz
centuma/A
ĉevala/ANn
cifera/CENnrw
cirilalfabeta/E
ĉizi/AloSTv
cola/AhO
danĝera/ACGsV
data/Anx
decida/BE[
defali/BOVY
dekmil/N
de/kz
delegito/cFK
deva/Aqw
difinita/bCEY
dio/hFq
direkta/ACcEiNnP
diri/AahlOqRTtY[_]
disa/ACGLPQ
disciplinema/Em
diskuti/ABDGORT
disputa/As
distribui/ALORQTY
distrikto/AO_
dividi/ALOQTYz_
dolĉa/CEM
domini/BCV
doni/AafGOQRTBtYz
dorsa/APY`
dosiero/ceO
dubebla/CEY?
edza/CEGQrsx
edzina/CEGQsx
edzo/Ox
egaligi/AMOTy
ekscitmaŝino/AO
ekzemplo/AcOqy
elementa/ANnrw
emfaza/Ems
energidependa/ACO
enpoŝigi/ORT
envia/As
epoka/Ainw
epoko/AOu
erari/BeGV
esperanta/EpquY
esprimi/BDLQTY
esprimo/AOy_^
etendu/lT
etna/CdENnr_^
etnobelo/F
evitebla/EO
faco/AOr^
fadena/ANns
fajfi/ekLOV
falĉilo/AeO
falegi/BVz
falu/AafGlORVz_÷
fandu/AfjlQTtYz
farita/bCY
faru/AalOTy
fasono/AcO
fekunda/AMCGOV
fermu/AhoQRTv
fiksa/EM]
fila/hFu
flamu/AGkV
flanka/ACiNnP
flankigi/dfAOTXz
flari/AklOopT[
flatu/loT
fleksi/ABQT_
fleksu/lMT
flugu/AadfklOoRtVvz÷^
flui/AfGJjlOQtVBvY
fluu/AaekORVz^
foja/EiNnR
fokusa/ACOz
fokusigi/AOTvX
folia/ANnr
forigi/ADOTB[
forĵeti/DOTY
forma/ACGNnQw
forta/ACGMOQsUVY^
fortikaĵa/AOo
frato/FjO
frazo/AceOo_^
frivola/ABCMOUY
frotu/AdklOrTvz
fulmi/AekOV
fundamenta/CEqsw
funkcia/cENnwy
gastigi/FTvX
gastludi/AFOV
genepoj/Ou
germanigi/alTvy
glata/CEGmQY
glitu/AdfklVvy÷
globa/Ah
glui/AajLQRTvY`
gluti/fOTvy
gramatika/CEqwYy
grandfida/EMU
gratu/dfklpTz
grava/CEmY
gusta/Awy[]
gusto/Oy[]
guteti/AOV
gvardiestro/AOx
ĥaldeo/CFGQY
havu/AjkGMRTv`
herezulo/cF
hieraŭa/AOX[
historia/AOu[
histriono/F
homa/EMNnrs
homigi/ARsTvX
homo/ACeOu^
honti/ABDGkOV
hora/AhNn
horo/hO
hundo/eFHJKS
identigi/ALOTXy
ido/FKSu
impresa/Ai
indika/Ab
insinui/ATBY
instruito/bF
intelekta/Aq
intuicia/Eq
iri/AaGJlTv÷
irstata/AlO
iru/AdfGjkORVwz[_]
izolita/CEO
jaka/As
jaro/AhO^
ĵeti/AdfkLORTtz_
judo/EF
juĝu/apTy
jungu/ajlMRTv
jupo/AeO_
jura/ASOZ
kalkuli/AajLlOpRTvy[
kampa/Ain
kapa/AN`
kaptito/jF
kaptu/fklTv
karakterizo/AbO
kartoĉo/e
kateni/AaMQT
kaŭzo/AcOu
kaza/AiNn_
klapa/ANn]
klariga/Abs
klarsenca/Am
klasika/ACOSUYZ]
klini/AaCfklOQTz_
kodi/MRSTty
koko/Fx
kola/AOo]
kolekti/AHLORQSTBY
koleri/ABekGOQV]
kolora/ENn
komandi/acFT
kombini/AMORQTBYy
komenti/DKSOT
komentu/fMT
komprenebla/bCEGMVYy
kompreneblon/bEMXy
komprenigi/AhOTX
komunismo/AOq
koncepta/Awy
kondamni/ADMOTB
konduki/AdfjLlRTt÷
kondukti/ACOTY
konduti/AOVYy
konformismo/EOX
konkeri/AORTB
konscia/CEGQsY_
konscienca/AOs
konstruu/AGQRTvY_^
kontenta/AbCeGMOQUV
kopii/DRST
korekti/fLOQSTYy
kratero/AeO
krementi/AadLOQTY[]
krii/AklOT]
kristaligi/AlRTX
krurulo/FN
kudru/ahjRTv
kunteksta/En
kuru/aAefjkloRtVvz[]
kuŝi/ABFGhjkORQT_
kutima/CEqwx
kuzo/F
laborema/AjMOU
laborlibera/ACO
landa/Adinv
larĝigi/AMTXz
lasi/AadfRTv÷]
laŭta/CEMV
leĝa/CEqsw
legu/AklROQTy[÷
leporlipo/AO
levi/AefkLOQRT
ligu/AajkMORoQrTz
lingva/ACciNnPrUuY
lingvo/cKOrSuW
litera/ENnrY
literatura/CEs
logi/AadlMOQTY
loĝi/AkGpQT
loka/EiMNnP`
loki/AdQRTtyz
longa/CdeEmw
longhara/AMU
lumo/AhO]
majstro/F_
maldekstra/Ad
malfari/ALORT
maniero/OSyZ
maniko/AhO
mano/AeOo
marki/ALOTz
marŝi/AklOV÷
maso/AOq
mejla/ANn
memori/ADGOQRTY
menciita/CEY
mensa/Ai
merizo/AO
meti/AadflOQqRrTtvz[^`]
mezura/A^
migri/aABfklOtUVv
militi/AkqrV
mini/ATOq_
modifita/CE
molesti/ABOT
momenta/ENn
monaĥino/GJQx
monda/AntUuWY_
morgaŭa/AOX]
mortinto/CFJUY
mortu/fkV
mova/AbN
munti/ADLMORSTvY
murmureti/AkOV
naĝi/AafklVv_
nelonga/A[
nepo/Fu
nocio/AKO_^
norena/A
noti/DKT
notlibro/AeO
noto/AhO
nutru/AT_^
objektiva/CEMSZ
oficiro/Fx_
okaza/EiNnw
opinia/Ainz
ordigi/ABjORTX
ordoni/ABOqTY
orta/ACOV
ortodoksa/ACmUZx
ortografia/Ehy
pafu/AaflOQTyz÷
pagi/AadpROLGT[]
pagipova/EU
paku/ljTv
parta/AGNnQVY
patrujo/Iu
peka/AGQs
penetrebla/EhOY
permesi/ABfLMOT
persona/CcENn
pezi/ACGLMOqVY^
piku/AaklQT
pinta/CEMNn`
planti/ALMOQTtv
plaŭdi/AkeGOV
plekti/AjMOoQrTvY÷
plenumi/GMQRT[
plenumiĝo/EMOR[
plumo/e
portreta/AbO
portu/AdfjloRTtvz_
portugalujano/FI
pozicia/An]
pozitiva/EMY
pragmatiko/AOUpok
preciza/ACLGMBOQY
premu/AadefklMoQrTvz÷_^
preni/AaBDdfLlOoRTtY
presi/AGLOQRSTvtY`
prezenti/AFGORTYy
prezidanto/CFx
problemo/AceO_
profesia/Ew
proksima/CEemP
provoki/ABOTY
puŝi/AafjklOQRrTvz÷
rabena/AcO
rada/ANn
radii/AOLV
radiu/AlpTz`
raketa/AOq
rampi/adflVz
rangi/AOUV_^
reagi/AOV_^[
redakti/cFfLRTy
referenci/ADKLOT
regula/CEmqwY
reklama/Es
reliefa/AGQs
relo/cOq
revolucia/A[]
ridi/AekGOV_
rigidigi/aOTX
rilata/EiNnr
riproĉi/ADOT
romanika/ACY
ronĝi/AT÷
rubando/AeO
rulu/AadfjklOQTtvz
rusigi/aLlTvy
samenhava/AM
ŝanco/Oy
ŝarĝi/AlMOTt^
segmenta/At_^
segmento/O_^
sekci/AdLOrTY
seksa/Ap
seksisma/EOq
semajno/hO
senca/ACcGiNnQqVY_
sendi/AafjLlORrTtYz
serĉu/AklOpRT÷
sezono/AcMOr[]
signifa/CcEwNn
signo/AeO[_^]Y
silaba/EGNnQx
similsignifa/Em
similspeca/Em
simio/Fhu
sincera/ACMOUV
skrapu/dfpT
skribu/AalORQTtvYy[_^`]
skui/AeklOQTz
slovenujano/FI
soldato/AGQOx
ŝovi/AadefjlQRTtz÷_
ŝovo/AdOvY
sparko/AO
sperta/CEMsw
ŝpruci/AklRGVYz
staru/AGkoqRV[^
statuta/Aqwx
stila/Ais
stoika/ASCUZ
strato/eU
strikta/CEGmQ
studi/DT÷
ŝtupa/ACNn
subjekta/Es
sufiĉa/bCEeO
ŝuti/AdrjkOQTYz^`
ŝvebi/AkOVv÷^
taksi/AOTy_^
takta/ANnw
tamburisto/cF
teksta/Envw
tempa/AdCinru[]y
tempo/OrSuZ
tera/EPt^_
timeti/ADBGOQUT
tinti/kLV
tondi/dfLlopSTY
tradukita/CEh
trajno/AO_
trakti/AOpTY[]
tranĉi/AadfklLoQTYyz÷
treni/AafjlQTtvY÷
triki/jLMT
trudi/ABlOQTY
turnu/fhkloQTt
turo/AcO
tuŝiĝi/AjOrV
tuto/AO`^
urba/AcNnP[_
uzebla/EGROY
vagi/fkV
vagonŝtupo/AeO
vala/Aad
validigi/AMsTXx
valora/ENnw
varmsanga/Em
vastasenca/AM
veli/kV
velocipedo/AOuS
venĝi/ABOT
venvojo/AOR
vespera/ENn
vica/Aiw
vizaĝa/ANn
voĉo/heO
voja/Ahsv`
vojo/AcOo_
volonte/Em
vorto/AchO
zeloto/F
zorgu/AOpT[
